


Infrastructure - Wikipedia






















 






Infrastructure

From Wikipedia, the free encyclopedia


					Jump to:					navigation, 					search



Public infrastructure



Grand Coulee Dam



Assets and facilities




Airports
Bridges
Broadband
Canals
Coastal management
Critical infrastructure
Dams
Electricity
Energy
Hazardous waste
Hospitals
Irrigation schemes
Levees
Lighthouses
Parks
Pipeline transport
Ports
Mass transit
Public housing
State schools
Public spaces
Rail
Roads
Sewage
Sluices
Solid waste
Telecommunication
Utilities
Water supply
Weirs
Wastewater




Concepts




Asset management
Appropriation
Lindahl tax
Build-Operate-Transfer
Design-Build
Earmark
Fixed cost
Engineering contracts
Externality
Government debt
Life cycle assessment
Maintenance
Monopoly
Property tax
Public-private partnership
Public capital
Public finance
Public good
Public sector
Renovation
Replacement (upgrade)
Spillover effect
Supply chain
Taxation




Issues and ideas




Air traffic control
Brownfield
Carbon footprint
Containerization
Congestion pricing
Ecotax
Ethanol fuel
Fuel tax
Groundwater
High-speed rail
Hybrid vehicles
Land-use planning
Mobile data terminal
Pork barrel
Rapid bus transit
Recycling
Renewables
Reverse osmosis
Smart grid
Smart growth
Stormwater
Urban sprawl
Traffic congestion
Transit-oriented development
Vehicle efficiency
Waste-to-energy
Weatherization
Wireless technology




Fields of study




Architecture
Civil
Electrical
Mechanical engineering
Public economics
Public policy
Urban planning






Examples

Akashi Kaikyō Bridge
Trans-Alaska pipeline
Autobahn
Brazilian energy independence
Brooklyn Bridge
Channel Tunnel
Chicago wastewater
China's high-speed rail
Curtiba rapid bus transit
Danish wind-power
British offshore wind-power
Nuclear power in France
Solar power in Germany
Hoover Dam
Hong Kong Int'l Airport
Intercity-Express
Interstate highways
Jamnagar Refinery
Kansai Int'l Airport
Panama Canal
Port of Shanghai
San Francisco Bay Bridge
Three Gorges Dam
Shinkansen
Spanish high-speed rail
French TGV rail
Spanish autovias and autopistas
Transcontinental Railroad
Power transmission in the USA





Infrastructure portal





v
t
e





Infrastructure refers to the fundamental facilities and systems serving a country, city, or area,[1] including the services and facilities necessary for its economy to function.[2] It typically characterises technical structures such as roads, bridges, tunnels, water supply, sewers, electrical grids, telecommunications, and so forth, and can be defined as "the physical components of interrelated systems providing commodities and services essential to enable, sustain, or enhance societal living conditions."[3]



Contents


1 History
2 Definitions
3 Related concepts
4 Ownership and financing
5 Uses of the term

5.1 Engineering and construction
5.2 Civil defense and economic development
5.3 Military
5.4 Urban
5.5 Green infrastructure
5.6 Marxism
5.7 Communications


6 In the developing world

6.1 Regional differences
6.2 Sources of funding


7 See also
8 References
9 Bibliography
10 External links



History[edit]
Main article: History of infrastructure
According to the Online Etymology Dictionary,[4] the word infrastructure has been used in English since 1887 and in French since 1875, originally meaning "The installations that form the basis for any operation or system".[5]
The word was imported from French, where it means subgrade, the native material underneath a constructed pavement or railway. The word is a combination of the Latin prefix "infra", meaning "below", and "structure". The military use of the term achieved currency in the United States after the formation of NATO in the 1940s, and by 1970 was adopted by urban planners in its modern civilian sense.[6]
Definitions[edit]
A 1987 US National Research Council panel adopted the term "public works infrastructure", referring to:

"... both specific functional modes – highways, streets, roads, and bridges; mass transit; airports and airways; water supply and water resources; wastewater management; solid-waste treatment and disposal; electric power generation and transmission; telecommunications; and hazardous waste management – and the combined system these modal elements comprise. A comprehension of infrastructure spans not only these public works facilities, but also the operating procedures, management practices, and development policies that interact together with societal demand and the physical world to facilitate the transport of people and goods, provision of water for drinking and a variety of other uses, safe disposal of society's waste products, provision of energy where it is needed, and transmission of information within and between communities."[7]

The OECD also classifies communications as a part of infrastructure.[8]
The American Society of Civil Engineers has not defined the term, though issuing a US "Infrastructure Report Card" every 2-4 years.[9] As of 2017[update] they grade 16 categories, namely Aviation, Bridges, Dams, Drinking Water, Energy, Hazardous Waste, Inland Waterways, Levees, Parks & Recreation, Ports, Rail, Roads, Schools, Solid Waste, Transit and Wastewater.[9]:4
Hard infrastructure refers to the physical networks necessary for the functioning of a modern industrial nation.[citation needed] Soft infrastructure may refer to the institutions which are required to maintain an economy,[10] like health, and cultural and social standards of a country, such as the financial system, the education system, the health care system, the system of government, and law enforcement, as well as emergency services.[5][11]
The term critical infrastructure distinguishes those infrastructure elements that, if significantly damaged or destroyed, would cause serious disruption of a system or organization. Storm, flood, or earthquake damage leading to loss of certain transportation routes in a city, for example bridges crossing a river, that would make it impossible for people to evacuate, and for emergency services to operate, would be deemed critical infrastructure. Similarly, an on-line booking system might be critical infrastructure for an airline. These elements of infrastructure are the focus of recovery efforts in the aftermath of natural disasters.[citation needed]
Related concepts[edit]
The term infrastructure may be confused with the following overlapping or related concepts.
Land improvement and land development are general terms that in some contexts may include infrastructure, but in the context of a discussion of infrastructure would refer only to smaller scale systems or works that are not included in infrastructure, because they are typically limited to a single parcel of land, and are owned and operated by the land owner. For example, an irrigation canal that serves a region or district would be included with infrastructure, but the private irrigation systems on individual land parcels would be considered land improvements, not infrastructure. Service connections to municipal service and public utility networks would also be considered land improvements, not infrastructure.[12][13]
The term public works includes government-owned and operated infrastructure as well as public buildings, such as schools and court houses. Public works generally refers to physical assets needed to deliver public services. Public services include both infrastructure and services generally provided by government.
Ownership and financing[edit]
Main article: Infrastructure and economics





It has been suggested that Infrastructure and economics be merged into this section. (Discuss) Proposed since March 2015.


Infrastructure may be owned and managed by governments or by private companies, such as sole public utility or railway companies. Generally, most roads, major ports and airports, water distribution systems and sewage networks are publicly owned, whereas most energy and telecommunications networks are privately owned.[citation needed] Publicly owned infrastructure may be paid for from taxes, tolls, or metered user fees, whereas private infrastructure is generally paid for by metered user fees.[citation needed] Major investment projects are generally financed by the issuance of long-term bonds.[citation needed]
Government owned and operated infrastructure may be developed and operated in the private sector or in public-private partnerships, in addition to in the public sector. As of 2008[update] in the United States for example, public spending on infrastructure has varied between 2.3% and 3.6% of GDP since 1950.[14] Many financial institutions invest in infrastructure. In Keynesian economics, the word infrastructure was exclusively used to describe public assets that facilitate production, but not private assets of the same purpose. In post-Keynesian times, the word has grown in popularity and has been applied with increasing generality to suggest the internal framework discernible in any technology system or business organisation.[citation needed]
Uses of the term[edit]
Engineering and construction[edit]
Engineers generally limit the term "infrastructure" to describe fixed assets that are in the form of a large network, in other words, hard infrastructure.[citation needed] Efforts to devise more generic definitions of infrastructures have typically referred to the network aspects of most of the structures, and to the accumulated value of investments in the networks as assets.[citation needed] One such definition from 1998 defined infrastructure as the network of assets "where the system as a whole is intended to be maintained indefinitely at a specified standard of service by the continuing replacement and refurbishment of its components".[15]
Civil defense and economic development[edit]
See also: Civil defense by country
Civil defense planners and developmental economists generally refer to both hard and soft infrastructure, including public services such as schools and hospitals, emergency services such as police and fire fighting, and basic financial services. The notion of Infrastructure-based development combining long-term infrastructure investments by government agencies at central and regional levels with public private partnerships has proven popular among Asian, notably Singaporean and Chinese; Mainland European; and Latin American economists.
Military[edit]
Military strategists use the term infrastructure to refer to all building and permanent installations necessary for the support of military forces, whether they are stationed in bases, being deployed or engaged in operations. For example barracks, headquarters, airfields, communications facilities, stores of military equipment, port installations, and maintenance stations.[16]
Urban[edit]
Urban or municipal infrastructure refers to hard infrastructure systems generally owned and operated by municipalities, such as streets, water distribution, and sewers. It may also include some of the facilities associated with soft infrastructure, such as parks, public pools, schools, hospitals and libraries.
Green infrastructure[edit]
Green infrastructure (or blue-green infrastructure) is a concept that highlights the importance of the natural environment in decisions about land use planning.[17][18] In particular there is an emphasis on the "life support" functions provided by a network of natural ecosystems, with an emphasis on interconnectivity to support long-term sustainability. Examples include clean water and healthy soils, as well as the more anthropocentric functions such as recreation and providing shade and shelter in and around towns and cities. The concept can be extended to apply to the management of stormwater runoff at the local level through the use of natural systems, or engineered systems that mimic natural systems, to treat polluted runoff.[19][20]
Marxism[edit]
In Marxism, the term infrastructure is sometimes used as a synonym for "base" in the dialectic synthetic pair base and superstructure. However the Marxist notion of base is broader than the non-Marxist use of the term infrastructure, and some soft infrastructure, such as laws, governance, regulations and standards, would be considered by Marxists to be part of the superstructure, not the base.[21]
Communications[edit]
The term infrastructure may refer to informal and formal channels of communication, political and social networks, or beliefs held by members of particular groups, as well as information technology, software development tools. Still underlying these more conceptual uses is the idea that infrastructure provides organizing structure and support for the system or organization it serves, whether it is a city, a nation, a corporation, or a collection of people with common interests. Examples include IT infrastructure, research infrastructure, terrorist infrastructure, employment infrastructure and tourism infrastructure.[citation needed]
In the developing world[edit]
According to researchers at the Overseas Development Institute, the lack of infrastructure in many developing countries represents one of the most significant limitations to economic growth and achievement of the Millennium Development Goals (MDGs). Infrastructure investments and maintenance can be very expensive, especially in such areas as landlocked, rural and sparsely populated countries in Africa. It has been argued that infrastructure investments contributed to more than half of Africa's improved growth performance between 1990 and 2005, and increased investment is necessary to maintain growth and tackle poverty. The returns to investment in infrastructure are very significant, with on average thirty to forty percent returns for telecommunications (ICT) investments, over forty percent for electricity generation, and eighty percent for roads.[22]
Regional differences[edit]
The demand for infrastructure, both by consumers and by companies is much higher than the amount invested.[22] There are severe constraints on the supply side of the provision of infrastructure in Asia.[23] The infrastructure financing gap between what is invested in Asia-Pacific (around US$48 billion) and what is needed (US$228 billion) is around US$180 billion every year.[22]
In Latin America, three percent of GDP (around US$71 billion) would need to be invested in infrastructure in order to satisfy demand, yet in 2005, for example, only around two percent was invested leaving a financing gap of approximately US$24 billion.[22]
In Africa, in order to reach the seven percent annual growth calculated to be required to meet the MDGs by 2015 would require infrastructure investments of about fifteen percent of GDP, or around US$93 billion a year. In fragile states, over thirty-seven percent of GDP would be required.[22]
Sources of funding[edit]
The source of financing varies significantly across sectors. Some sectors are dominated by government spending, others by overseas development aid (ODA), and yet others by private investors.[22]
In Sub-Saharan Africa, governments spend around US$9.4 billion out of a total of US$24.9 billion. In irrigation, governments represent almost all spending. In transport and energy a majority of investment is government spending. In ICT and water supply and sanitation, the private sector represents the majority of capital expenditure. Overall, between them aid, the private sector, and non-OECD financiers exceed government spending. The private sector spending alone equals state capital expenditure, though the majority is focused on ICT infrastructure investments. External financing increased in the 2000s (decade) and in Africa alone external infrastructure investments increased from US$7 billion in 2002 to US$27 billion in 2009. China, in particular, has emerged as an important investor.[22]
See also[edit]


Infrastructure portal




Airport infrastructure
Asset Management Plan
Green infrastructure
Infrastructure as a service
Infrastructure asset management
Infrastructure security
Logistics
Megaproject
Project finance
Pseudo-urbanization
Public capital
Sustainable architecture
Sustainable engineering


References[edit]


^ . Infrastructure | Define Infrastructure at Dictionary.com
^ O'Sullivan, Arthur; Sheffrin, Steven M. (2003). Economics: Principles in Action. Upper Saddle River, New Jersey 07458: Pearson Prentice Hall. p. 474. ISBN 0-13-063085-3. 
^ Fulmer, Jeffrey (2009). "What in the world is infrastructure?". PEI Infrastructure Investor (July/August): 30–32. 
^ Online Etymology Dictionary. Douglas Harper, Historian. http://dictionary.reference.com/browse/infrastructure (accessed: April 24, 2008)
^ a b "Soft Infrastructure – Definition". Archived from the original on 2011-07-23. Retrieved 2015-03-21. 
^ Stephen Lewis The Etymology of Infrastructure and the Infrastructure of the Internet, blog Hag Pak Sak, posted September 22, 2008.
^ Infrastructure for the 21st Century, Washington, D.C.: National Academy Press, 1987.
^ OECD Economic Infrastructure. Common Reporting Standard (CRS) Codes 2 pages, n.d.
^ a b 2017 Infrastructure Report, 112pp, American Society of Civil Engineers, 2017
^ The soft infrastructure of a market economy Archived 2011-03-28 at the Wayback Machine. William A. Niskanen, 1991, Cato Journal, Vol.11, No.2, 233-238, Cato Institute
^ "Infrastructure in India" (PDF). Archived from the original (PDF) on 2011-07-03. Retrieved 2010-10-24. 
^ Land improvement, Online BusinessDictionary.com, http://www.businessdictionary.com/definition/land-development.html (accessed January 31, 2009)
^ Land development, Online BusinessDictionary.com, http://www.businessdictionary.com/definition/land-development.html (accessed January 31, 2009)
^ The New York Times, "Money for Public Projects", November 19, 2008 (accessed January 26, 2009)
^ Association of Local Government Engineers New Zealand: "Infrastructure Asset Management Manual", June 1998 - Edition 1.1
^ D.O.D. Dictionary of Military and Associated Terms, 2001 (rev. 2005)
^ The Conservation Fund, Arlington, VA. "Green Infrastructure." Accessed 2009-10-06.
^ Maryland Department of Natural Resources, Annapolis, MD. Maryland's Green Infrastructure Assessment: A Comprehensive Strategy for Land Conservation and Restoration. Archived 2008-03-09 at the Wayback Machine. May 2003.
^ U.S. Environmental Protection Agency (EPA), Washington, D.C., et al., Green Infrastructure Statement of Intent. 2007-04-19. Archived May 12, 2009, at the Wayback Machine.
^ EPA et al. "Managing Wet Weather with Green Infrastructure: Action Strategy 2008." January 2008. Archived May 12, 2009, at the Wayback Machine.
^ Marx, Karl Heinrich (1818–1883), accessed January 9, 2011.
^ a b c d e f g Christian K.M. Kingombe 2011. Mapping the new infrastructure financing landscape. London: Overseas Development Institute
^ Peter McCawley (2010), 'Infrastructure Policy in Developing countries', Asian-Pacific Economic Literature, 24(1), May. See also Asian-Pacific Economic Literature Policy Brief No 19, May 2010, on 'Infrastructure policy in developing countries in Asia'.


Nurre, Sarah G. "Restoring infrastructure systems: An integrated network design and scheduling (INDS) problem." European Journal of Operational Research. (12/2012), 223 (3), p. 794–806.
Bibliography[edit]

Ascher, Kate; researched by Wendy Marech (2007). The works: anatomy of a city (Reprint. ed.). New York: Penguin Press. ISBN 978-0143112709. 
Larry W. Beeferman, "Pension Fund Investment in Infrastructure: A Resource Paper", Capital Matter (Occasional Paper Series), No.3 December 2008
A. Eberhard, "Infrastructure Regulation in Developing Countries", PPIAF Working Paper No. 4 (2007) World Bank
M. Nicolas J. Firzli and Vincent Bazi, "Infrastructure Investments in an Age of Austerity : The Pension and Sovereign Funds Perspective", published jointly in Revue Analyse Financière, Q4 2011 issue, pp. 34–37 and USAK/JTW July 30, 2011 (online edition)
Hayes, Brian (2005). Infrastructure: the book of everything for the industrial landscape (1st ed.). New York City: Norton. ISBN 978-0393329599. 
Huler, Scott (2010). On the grid: a plot of land, an average neighborhood, and the systems that make our world work. Emmaus, Penn.: Rodale. ISBN 978-1-60529-647-0. 
Georg Inderst, "Pension Fund Investment in Infrastructure", OECD Working Papers on Insurance and Private Pensions, No. 32 (2009)

External links[edit]



Wikimedia Commons has media related to Infrastructure.





Look up infrastructure in Wiktionary, the free dictionary.



Body of Knowledge on Infrastructure Regulation
Next Generation Infrastructures international research programme
Report Card on America's Infrastructure







v
t
e


Infrastructure






Bridge
Canal
Causeway
Dam
Drainage
Footbridge
Interchange
Levee
Overpass
Road
Skyway
Storm drain
Tunnel








See also: Architecture
Arena
Civil engineering
Construction
Playground
Stadium
Theatre
Urban park












v
t
e


Public infrastructure



assets
and
facilities



Airports
Bridges
Broadband
Canals
Critical infrastructure
Dams
Electricity generation
Energy development
Hazardous waste
Hospitals
Levees
Lighthouses
Municipal solid waste
Parks
Ports
Public housing
Public spaces
Public transport
Public utilities
Public works
Rail transport
Roads
Sewage
State schools
Telecommunications
Wastewater
Water supply network
Wind power





concepts



Appropriation
Infrastructure asset management
Build–operate–transfer
Design–build
Earmark
Engineering contracts
Externality
Fixed cost
Government debt
Life-cycle assessment
Lindahl tax
Maintenance, repair, and operations
Natural monopoly
Property tax
Public capital
Public finance
Public good
Public sector
Public–private partnership
Renovation
Spillover effect
Supply chain
Taxation
Upgrade





issues
and
ideas



Air traffic control
Brownfield land
Bus rapid transit
Carbon footprint
Congestion pricing
Containerization
Ethanol fuel
Fuel efficiency
Fuel tax
Groundwater
High-speed rail
Hybrid vehicles
Land-use planning
Mobile data terminal
Pork barrel
Recycling
Renewable resources
Reverse osmosis
Smart grid
Smart growth
Stormwater
Sustainable urban infrastructure
Traffic congestion
Transit-oriented development
Urban sprawl
Waste-to-energy
Weatherization
Wireless





fields
of study



Architecture
Civil engineering
Electrical engineering
Mechanical engineering
Public economics
Public policy
Urban planning





examples



Akashi Kaikyō Bridge
Autobahn
Brooklyn Bridge
Bus rapid transit systems
Channel Tunnel
Controlled-access highway systems
Electric power transmission
High-speed trains
Hong Kong International Airport
Hoover Dam
Humber Bridge
Kansai International Airport
Millau Viaduct
Nuclear power
Offshore wind farms
Panama Canal
Port of Shanghai
San Francisco–Oakland Bay Bridge
Solar power
Three Gorges Dam
Trans-Alaska pipeline
Transcontinental railroads












v
t
e


Railway infrastructure



Permanent
way



Permanent way (history)
Permanent way (current)
Railroad tie/Sleeper
Rail fastening system
Track ballast
Rail profile
Fishplate
Breather switch
Datenail
Axe ties
Ladder track
Baulk road
Cant
Minimum radius
Track transition curve
Clip and scotch





Trackwork
and track
structures



Junction
Wye
Railroad switch
Gauntlet track
Railway electrification system

Third rail
Overhead lines


Guide bar
Track gauge
Track geometry
Railway turntable
Water crane
Track pan
Coaling tower
Rail track
Tramway track
Classification yard
Rail yard
Siding
Passing loop
Balloon loop
Headshunt
Refuge siding
Dual gauge
Roll way





Signalling
and safety



Derail
Railway signalling
Signalling control
Wayside horn
Railway signal
Interlocking
Level crossing
Buffer stop
Catch points
Loading gauge
Structure gauge
Block post
Train stop
Signal bridge
Tell-tale





Buildings



Railway station
Station building
Railway station layout
Station clock
Train shed
Goods shed
Motive power depot
Roundhouse
Railway platform









Authority control



GND: 4026944-9
NDL: 00571883










 
						Retrieved from "https://en.wikipedia.org/w/index.php?title=Infrastructure&oldid=793560288"					
Categories: ConstructionDevelopmentInfrastructureHidden categories: Webarchive template wayback linksArticles containing potentially dated statements from 2017All articles containing potentially dated statementsAll articles with unsourced statementsArticles with unsourced statements from March 2017Articles to be merged from March 2015All articles to be mergedArticles containing potentially dated statements from 2008Wikipedia articles with GND identifiers 



Navigation menu


Personal tools

Not logged inTalkContributionsCreate accountLog in 



Namespaces

Article
Talk




Variants









Views

Read
Edit
View history



More







Search



 







Navigation


Main pageContentsFeatured contentCurrent eventsRandom articleDonate to WikipediaWikipedia store 



Interaction


HelpAbout WikipediaCommunity portalRecent changesContact page 



Tools


What links hereRelated changesUpload fileSpecial pagesPermanent linkPage informationWikidata itemCite this page 



Print/export


Create a bookDownload as PDFPrintable version 



In other projects


Wikimedia Commons 



Languages


AfrikaansአማርኛالعربيةAzərbaycancaBân-lâm-gúБеларускаяБеларуская (тарашкевіца)‎БългарскиBosanskiCatalàČeštinaCymraegDanskDeutschEestiEspañolEsperantoEuskaraفارسیFrançaisGaeilgeGalego한국어Հայերենहिन्दीHrvatskiBahasa IndonesiaItalianoעבריתಕನ್ನಡქართულიҚазақшаKiswahiliລາວLatinaLatviešuLëtzebuergeschLietuviųLimburgsMagyarМакедонскиBahasa MelayuNederlands日本語Norsk bokmålNorsk nynorskਪੰਜਾਬੀភាសាខ្មែរPolskiPortuguêsRomânăРусскийScotsShqipසිංහලSimple EnglishSlovenščinaSoomaaligaکوردیСрпски / srpskiSrpskohrvatski / српскохрватскиBasa SundaSuomiSvenskaTagalogதமிழ்తెలుగుไทยTürkçeУкраїнськаاردوTiếng Việtייִדיש粵語中文 
Edit links 





 This page was last edited on 2 August 2017, at 14:33.
Text is available under the Creative Commons Attribution-ShareAlike License;
additional terms may apply.  By using this site, you agree to the Terms of Use and Privacy Policy. Wikipedia® is a registered trademark of the Wikimedia Foundation, Inc., a non-profit organization.


Privacy policy
About Wikipedia
Disclaimers
Contact Wikipedia
Developers
Cookie statement
Mobile view



 

 









China Infrastructure Report Q3 2017































| Compare 
About Us | 
Contact Us






Home
Research Category
Publisher List
Custom Research
Cart
Compare



Research Category
User Guide
Policies
Contact Us
About us
Site Map











Home > Market Research Report  > Infrastructure









Market Research Report
China Infrastructure Report Q3 2017



Published by
BMI Research
Product code
224323


Published
July 19, 2017
Content info
94 Pages Delivery time: 1-2 business days


Price








USD 1345

PDF by E-mail (Single user license) - Includes 3 FREE quarterly updates
























China Infrastructure Report Q3 2017



Published: July 19, 2017
Content info: 94 Pages














Description

BMI View: Despite being the world's largest construction market, China's infrastructure industry faces a
number of challenges in the coming years. Declining economic growth rates will spill over into the
construction sector, while high public debt will limit the government's ability to provide the same level of
fiscal support for infrastructure projects as in the past.
Forecast & Industry Developments:

The construction industry in China will grow by 6.8% in 2017 and an annual average of 5.3% through 2021, as activity in the sector slows in line with the overall economy. The 13th Five-Year Plan will provide support to the infrastructure sector over the next two years, especially in the transport, power and water segments.



The construction industry's share of GDP will slowly decline from 6.6% in 2017 to 6.0% in 2026 as the government attempts to shift China's economy toward a consumption-led growth model. Concerns of overcapacity in steel and cement production, as well as the supply of residential and commercial real estate will dampen investment interest across the industry.




Private capital is expected to play a growing role in China's infrastructure industry, with the government pushing for the use of public-private partnerships in implementing or operating many upcoming projects. While power, water and toll-road assets have a successful PPP track record in China, projects in lesscommon sectors may see a lack of investment interest.




Table of Contents
Product Code: 1752-5306Table of Contents

BMI Industry View 
Forecast & Industry Developments 

Table: Five-Year Forecast Scenario (China 2017-2021)
Table: Infrastructure Risk Reward Index (China 2017)

SWOT 
Infrastructure SWOT 
Industry Forecast 
China - Construction and Infrastructure - Q2 2017 
Latest Updates 

Table: Construction And Infrastructure Industry Data (China 2016-2026)

Structural Trends 
Transport Infrastructure - Outlook And Overview 
Latest Updates 

Table: Transport Infrastructure Industry Data (China 2016-2026)

Structural Trends 

Table: China - Major Transport Infrastructure Projects

Energy And Utilities Infrastructure - Outlook and Overview 
Latest Updates 

Table: Energy And Utilities Infrastructure Data (China 2017-2027)

Structural Trends 

Table: China - Major Energy & Utilities Projects

Residential/Non Residential Building - Outlook And Overview 
Latest Updates 

Table: Residential And Non-Residential Building Industry Data (China 2017-2026)

Structural Trends 

Table: Recent Housing Policies Enacted By Major Cities
Table: Construction And Social Infrastructure

Industry Risk Reward Ratings 
China - Asia's Largest Construction Market Is Filled With Risks 
Asia Risk/Reward Index 
Market Overview 

Competitive Landscape 


Table: China - Company Financial Data

Company Profile 
PowerChina 
Shanghai Construction Group 
China Railway Group 
China Railway Construction Corporation 
China Communications Construction Company 

Table: Infrastructure Unit Results, RMBmn (Unless Otherwise Stated)

13th Five-Year Plan 
13th Five-Year Plan: Key Points 
Summary Of Contents 

Chapter 1: Overview 


Table: Targets


Chapter 2: Innovation To Drive Development 
Chapter 3: Economic Institutions 
Chapter 4: Modernisation Of The Agricultural Sector 
Chapter 5: Industries 
Chapter 6: Expand The Network Economy 
Chapter 7: Build A Modern Infrastructure Network 
Chapter 8: New-Type Urbanisation 
Chapter 9: Coordination Of Regional Development 
Chapter 10: Environmental Protection 
Chapter 11: Continue Opening Up 

Others: 
Methodology 
Infrastructure Forecast Methodology 
Industry Forecast Methodology 
Sector-Specific Methodology 
Infrastructure Risk/Reward Index 








Phone


Int'l: +1-860-674-8796
TollFree(US): +1-866-353-3335
Europe: +32-2-535-7543
Asia: +65-6223-2436


New for 2017 !

GII now purchases any market research reports from any publishers for you.  
			With noextra cost.
Contact us for more details.

FAQ


Delivery Time
User License
Payment Options
Compare Multiple Reports


RELATED REPORTS


US Smart Water Infrastructure: Market Forecast (2017 - 2027) published: Jul 27, 2017
Electric Power Transmission & Distribution (T&D) Infrastructure Market 2017-2027: CAPEX Forecasts for AC, DC, HVAC, HVDC, UHVDC and UHVAC and Top Companies Profile published: Jul 13, 2017
India Infrastructure Report Q3 2017 published: Jun 28, 2017
Infrastructure Insight: The US published: Jun 27, 2017
High Voltage Cable Market (By Product Type: Overhead, Submarine, and Underground; By End User: Renewable Energy, Industrial, and Infrastructure; By Geography) Global Scenario, Market Size, Outlook, Trend and Forecast, 2015-2024 published: Jun 21, 2017
Indonesia Infrastructure Report Q3 2017 published: Jun 7, 2017
Malaysia Infrastructure Report Q3 2017 published: Jun 7, 2017
Infrastructure Insight: Vietnam published: May 31, 2017
Philippines Infrastructure Report Q3 2017 published: May 24, 2017
Thailand Infrastructure Report Q3 2017 published: May 24, 2017



 ▼


















About
Contact
User Guide
Policies
Site Map



© Copyright 1997-2017, Global Information, Inc. All rights reserved.






 IDFC – Infrastructure Finance Company, Investment Banking and India Infrastructure Development






































  





Contact Us










 Our Firm 


  Overview  
  Values  
  Leadership  



  Our Businesses 


 IDFC Bank 
 IDFC Securities  


  Alternative Asset 
            Management  
  Private Equity  
  Infrastructure  
  Real Estate  


  Public Market 
            Asset Management  
  Mutual Fund 
  IDFC IDF 


  IDFC Foundation   



  Thought Leadership 
  Investor Relations 


  Financial Information  
  Corporate Governance  
  Shareholder Information  


  Investor Pack  
  Investor FAQs  
  Investor Contact  



  Careers 

  Media Room 


  Press Releases  
  Send us a Query  
  Media Contacts  































IDFC In Our Hands
 Empowers the youth to bring about a change in the world. It is a platform to voice your concerns to create a future that makes us proud.

Read more 


 We are building the India of tomorrow
 Our breadth of services combined with our domain expertise in infrastructure gives
                us the ability to capitalize on the opportunities for developing, financing and
                implementing infrastructure projects.

Read more
 

 We take pride in our work
 Our work culture, based on the pillars of knowledge, expertise, teamwork and stewardship
                helps us create a better aligned and synergized platform that delivers growth and
                helps us distinguish ourselves in the market.

Read more 
 

 We are IDFC
 One dream transformed a nation, one stone builds the foundation, One Firm drives
                the growth of India's infrastructure - IDFC.

Read more 
 






















Enabling India
 We   have been an integral part of the country's development story since   1997, when our company was formed with the specific mandate to build the   nation.
Read more







 

   

IDFC Websites - IDFC Bank|IDFC IFL|IDFC Mutual Fund|IDFC Institute|IDFC Careers | IDFC Foundation | IDFC Bank Careers

© , IDFC Limited. All Rights Reserved.
Privacy Policy  |  Disclaimer  |  Sitemap  |  GST Registration Numbers


























Infrastructure


















































































 























Topics



What's New



Amazon Set for "Spectacular Collapse"




Buffett's Bet on 'Sticky' Apple Pays Off


Topics

News
Financial Advisors
Markets
Anxiety Index
Investing
Managing Wealth
ETFs
The Trump Economy
Retirement
Personal Finance
Trading
ETFs Made Simple
Tech
Life Stages
Small Business
Bitcoin





Reference



Dictionary
Term Of The Day

Total Return Swap
A swap agreement in which one party makes payments based on a set rate, either fixed ... 
Read More »



Broker Reviews




Find the best broker for your trading or investing needs
See Reviews



Latest Videos


Influence: Terri Kallsen


Guides

Stock Basics
Economics Basics
Options Basics


Exam Prep

Series 7 Exam
CFA Level 1
Series 65 Exam





Advisors




Advisor Insights
Our network of expert financial advisors field questions from our community.
Ask A Question



Join Advisor Insights
Are you a financial advisor? Showcase your expertise to 20+ million investors.
Join Now



Financial Advisors
Sophisticated content for financial advisors around investment strategies, industry trends, and advisor education.


Find an Advisor

Atlanta
Los Angeles
Boston
New York
Houston





Markets




Markets
The latest markets news, real time quotes, financials and more.



Watchlist
Track stocks and ETFs
Add New Watchlist





Simulator




Stock Simulator
Trade with a starting balance of $100,000 and zero risk!



FX Trader
Trade the Forex market risk free using our free Forex trading simulator.






NEW
                                Academy
                            




Investopedia Academy
Learn from the world's leader in financial education
Check out all courses


Featured Courses



Become a day trader
Start Learning



Excel for Finance
Start Learning



Latest Courses


                                            Become a Day Trader
                                        

                                            Excel for Finance
                                        

                                            Fundamental Investing
                                        

                                            Coming soon: Financial Modeling
                                        

                                            All Courses
                                        






















Site Log In


Advisor Insights Log In



Newsletters

























Infrastructure









Share










































Loading the player...
















 

What is 'Infrastructure'
Infrastructure is the basic physical systems of a business or nation; transportation, communication, sewage, water and electric systems are all examples of infrastructure. These systems tend to be high-cost investments; however, they are vital to a country's economic development and prosperity. Projects related to infrastructure improvements may be funded publicly, privately or through public-private partnerships.

      
BREAKING DOWN 'Infrastructure'
      Applicable to large- and small-scale organizational frameworks, infrastructure can include a variety of systems and structures as long as there are physical components required. For example, the electrical grid across a city, state or country is infrastructure based on the equipment involved and the intent to provide a service to the areas it supports. Similarly, the physical cabling and components making up the data network of a company operating within a specific location are also infrastructure for the business in question, as they are necessary to support business operations.IT InfrastructureMany technical systems are often referred to as infrastructure, such as networking equipment and servers, due to the critical function they provide within certain business environments. Without the information technology (IT) infrastructure, many businesses struggle to share and move data in a way that promotes efficiency within the workplace. If IT infrastructure fails, many business functions cannot be performed.Infrastructure CategoriesAlong with the aforementioned sectors, infrastructure includes waste disposal services, such as garbage pickup and local dumps. Certain administrative functions, often covered through various government agencies, are also considered part of the infrastructure. Educational and health care facilities may also be included, along with certain research and development functions and necessary training facilities.Private Investment in Public InfrastructureSometimes private companies choose to invest in a country's infrastructure development as part of a business expansion effort. For example, an energy company might build pipelines and railways in a country where it wants to refine petroleum. This investment can benefit both the company and the country.For example, in 2005, Skyway Concession Company, LLC (SCC) entered into a 99-year lease with the City of Chicago for the operation and maintenance of the Chicago Skyway Bridge. As part of the agreement, SCC retains all rights to the toll and concession revenues generated by bridge, while the city benefits from a $1.83 billion cash infusion and is no longer responsible for maintaining the bridge.Individuals may also choose to fund improvements to certain pieces of public infrastructure. For example, an individual may fund improvements to hospitals, schools or local law enforcement efforts.Infrastructure as an Asset ClassInfrastructure is also an asset class that tends to be less volatile than equities over the long term and generally provides a higher yield. As a result, some companies and individuals like to invest in infrastructure funds for the defensive characteristics, such as funds involved in transportation or water infrastructure.






  


 









 




Trading Center




















                                                    Infrastructure Trust                                            




                                                    Capital Project                                            




                                                    Internet of Energy - IoE                                            




                                                    Impact Fee                                            




                                                    Concession Agreement                                            




                                                    Physical Option                                            




                                                    Asian Infrastructure Investment ...                                             




                                                    Transportation Bond                                            




                                                    International Finance Corporation                                            




Next Up 

































 

Dictionary:
#
a
b
c
d
e
f
g
h
i
j
k
l
m
n
o
p
q
r
s
t
u
v
w
x
y
z




Content Library
Articles
Terms
Videos
Guides
Slideshows
FAQs
Calculators
Chart Advisor
Stock Analysis
Stock Simulator
FXtrader
Exam Prep Quizzer
Net Worth Calculator




Connect With Investopedia
























Work With Investopedia
About Us
Advertise With Us
Write For Us
Contact Us
Careers




Get Free Newsletters
Newsletters









Work With Investopedia
About Us
Advertise With Us
Write For Us
Contact Us
Careers



© 2017, Investopedia, LLC.

All Rights Reserved
Terms Of Use
Privacy Policy




























Institute For Sustainable Infrastructure |






































 


















ENVISION

Why It Matters
How It Works
Project Awards
News & Events



JOIN

Create a Free Envision Account
Become an ISI Member



WHO USES ENVISION

Envision Qualified Companies
Envision Sustainability Professionals
Envision Supported Agencies



LEARNING CENTER

Blog
Training Materials
Case Studies
Webinars/Podcasts/Videos
Guides & Articles
Brochures
Presentations


DONATE















Blog
About ISI






Login  







 Remember me next time



Forgot Password
Login


Don't have an account?
Create your free Envision account now









Blog
About ISI








ENVISION

Why It Matters
How It Works
Project Awards
News & Events



JOIN

Create a Free Envision Account
Become an ISI Member



WHO USES ENVISION

Envision Qualified Companies
Envision Sustainability Professionals
Envision Supported Agencies



LEARNING CENTER

Blog
Case Studies
Webinars/Podcasts/Videos
Guides & Articles
Brochures
Presentations






Sustainable Infrastructure Benefits Communities
Envision&reg helps professionals communicate the value of developing more sustainable infrastructure
Learn More








BECOME AN ENVISION QUALIFIED
COMPANY OR AGENCY

Involved in infrastructure design, construction, or operation? Join our unique community of partners, practitioners, government agencies, and contractors.

Join Us






ENVISION: A RATING SYSTEM FOR
SUSTAINABLE INFRASTRUCTURE

The industry now has detailed guidance and metrics for sustainable infrastructure projects of every size and type.

Learn More






SUPPORTING THE
INFRASTRUCTURE COMMUNITY

Envision is a tool for owners, design teams, community and environmental groups, constructors, regulators, and policy makers.

Learn More






SUSTAINABLE INFRASTRUCTURE
BENEFITS COMMUNITIES

Envision helps professionals communicate the value of developing more sustainable infrastructure

Learn More














 

Create your free Envision account now.
Get Started















 




                        Training Material                                                
Example Credit Cover Sheets

ISI has prepared a package of example credit cover sheets—based on successfully verified projects—to aid project teams with their submissions for Envision verification. Click below…


                                            Download Now
                                    





 




                        Training Material                                                
Credit Cover Sheet Templates

ISI has developed credit cover sheet templates for all 60 credits in the Envision system. ISI strongly encourages project teams to use these templates when…


                                            Download Now
                                    





 




                        Training Material                                                
Credit Interpretations

Click here for supplemental information on assessing Envision credits.  


                                            Download Now
                                    





 




                        Case Study                                                
City of Los Angeles City Council Adopts Envision as a Policy

The City of Los Angeles, California, City Council approved the City Engineer’s decision to use Envision and receive project certifications, supported the Bureau of Engineering…


                                            Read Case Study
                                    





 




                        Training Material                                                
Envision Pilot Test

Click here for an approval form template for pilot testing the Envision credential program and project assessment tools.


                                            Download Now
                                    





 




                        Case Study                                                
Power Gone Platinum

Michaella Wittmann (July 2016) Michaella Wittmann (HDR Inc.) describe how the design team used Envision to meet the owner’s request to “Make it sustainable”. It…


                                            Read Case Study
                                    





 




                        Case Study                                                
Los Angeles County Board of Supervisors’ Motion to Adopt Envision

The Los Angeles County Board of Supervisors directed the Director of Public Works, the new Chief Sustainability Officer, and the CEO to expand and adopt…


                                            Read Case Study
                                    





 




                        Training Material                                                
Online Scoresheet – Self Assessment

Click here for a help file on the project self-assessment features in the online scoresheet.  


                                            Download Now
                                    





 




                        Training Material                                                
Online Scoresheet – Creating a Project

Click here for a help file on starting a project assessment in the online scoresheet.


                                            Download Now
                                    





 




                        Case Study                                                
Ridgewood View Park Reservoir and Pump Station: A Case Study on Envision Verification

Kelsey VandeBergh, Nick Augustus, and Corie Peterson (June 2016) Kelsey VandeBergh (AECOM), Nick Augustus (TVWD), and Corie Peterson (AECOM) describe the influence of Envision on…


                                            Read Case Study
                                    












The future is riding on infrastructure.
            Envision helps practitioners meet the challenge.


In communities across the country, infrastructure projects provide a wide array of challenges — from addressing community needs to meeting highly technical specifications.
                    Public works professionals, engineers, planners, contractors, policy experts, investors, and others are using Envision to overcome these challenges, one sustainable project
                    at a time.  This unique resource allows them to create projects that deliver value to their communites for decades — in environmental terms, as well as improvements
                    in quality of life and other areas.


The enduring legacy of sustainable infrastructure.
At the Institute for Sustainable infrastructure, our mission is to help communities build more sustainable infrastructure projects.  Our nonprofit organization was created for a
                    single purpose: to develop and maintain a sustainability rating system for all civil infrastructure.

                        In collaboration with then Zofnass Program for Sustainable Infrastructure at the Harvard
                    


University Graduate School of Design, we've developed Envision, a state-of-the-art resource that helps professionals plan and execute more sustainable infrastructure projects.
Provided at no cost to practitioners, Envision is a plain-language guide that combines a best practices library, field-proven checklists for infrastructure projects of every size and type,
                    and a comprehensive sustainability rating system that helps infrastructure owners gain recognition for  their well-planned and executed projects.









Latest News & Events


Istanbul’s New Airport is First European Infrastructure Project to Seek Envision Sustainability VerificationAugust 01, 2017“The Value of the Envision Conversation”August 01, 2017 
See All News & Events







From TwitterSoon to be largest airport in the world Istanbul New Airport @igairport is first project outside North America to register for #ISIenvision!August 1, 2017 9:22 amCheck out @HDR_Inc article on the benefits they find using #ISIenvision and important lessons learned bit.ly/2hgKHF8July 31, 2017 1:22 pm 
@ISIenvision













Who's Using Envision




2015 City of LA BOE
Co of LA DPW
MMSD
MSD, IN
Town Logo
DDC
City of Atlanta
 























Real estate development - Wikipedia






















 






Real estate development

From Wikipedia, the free encyclopedia


					Jump to:					navigation, 					search






This article needs additional citations for verification. Please help improve this article by adding citations to reliable sources. Unsourced material may be challenged and removed. (September 2013) (Learn how and when to remove this template message)






The Solidere development of the Beirut seafront






In the Netherlands virtually all housing is developed and built through property developers, including development in upmarket segments.


Real estate development, or property development, is a business process, encompassing activities that range from the renovation and re-lease of existing buildings to the purchase of raw land and the sale of developed land or parcels to others. Real estate developers are the people and companies who coordinate all of these activities, converting ideas from paper to real property.[1] Real estate development is different from construction, although many developers also manage the construction process.
Developers buy land, finance real estate deals, build or have builders build projects, create, imagine, control and orchestrate the process of development from the beginning to end.[2] Developers usually take the greatest risk in the creation or renovation of real estate—and receive the greatest rewards. Typically, developers purchase a tract of land, determine the marketing of the property, develop the building program and design, obtain the necessary public approval and financing, build the structures, and rent out, manage, and ultimately sell it.[1]
Sometimes property developers will only undertake part of the process. For example, some developers source a property and get the plans and permits approved before selling the property with the plans and permits to a builder at a premium price. Alternatively, a developer that is also a builder may purchase a property with the plans and permits in place so that they do not have the risk of failing to obtain planning approval and can start construction on the development immediately.
Developers work with many different counterparts along each step of this process, including architects, city planners, engineers, surveyors, inspectors, contractors, lawyers, leasing agents, etc. In the Town and Country Planning context in the United Kingdom, 'development' is defined in the Town and Country Planning Act 1990 s55.



Contents


1 Credentials
2 Statutory definition of development in the United Kingdom
3 Paths for entering the development field
4 Organizing for development
5 Land development
6 See also
7 References



Credentials[edit]
There is no specific credential required, nor license necessary, for a person or company to call himself a real estate developer.[3] A real estate developer is not a professional designation, there are no schools or associations who recognize or protect the term as a trademark. Some real estate developers, often those involved in marketing properties through traditional real estate channels, choose to join business associations such as SIOR. Many aspects of the real estate development process require local or state licensing, such as acting as a real estate broker or sales agent along with filing title work and/or construction and/or engineering, etc. Licensed contractors who follow blueprints designed by licensed architects and licensed engineers.
Statutory definition of development in the United Kingdom[edit]
'Development' is defined by statute in the Town and Country Planning Act 1990 s55(1), as 'the carrying out of building, engineering, mining or other operations in, on, over or under land, or the making of any material change in the use of any buildings or other land'. This definition is clarified by the remainder of s55 and the inclusion of the Generally Permitted Development Order 1995 and the Use Classes Order 1987. In favour of statement.
Paths for entering the development field[edit]
Main article: Real estate development education
No single path leads automatically to success in real estate development. Developers come from a variety of disciplines— construction, urban planning, lending, architecture, law and accounting, among others. Recent specialized programs that award a Master of Real Estate Development (MRED) degree are also available. The graduate programs in real estate development are the most comprehensive education in the real estate industry. Other formal education includes a Master of Science in Real Estate (MSRE), or an MBA.
Organizing for development[edit]
A development team can be put together in one of several ways. At one extreme, a large company might include many services, from architecture to engineering. At the other end of the spectrum, a development company might consist of one principal and a few staff who hire or contract with other companies and professionals for each service as needed.
Assembling a team of professionals to address the environmental, economic, private, physical and political issues inherent in a complex development project is critical. A developer's success depends on the ability to coordinate and lead the completion of a series of interrelated activities efficiently and at the appropriate time.
Development process requires skills of many professionals: architects, landscape architects, civil engineers and site planners to address project design; market consultants to determine demand and a project's economics; attorneys to handle agreements and government approvals; environmental consultants and soils engineers to analyze a site's physical limitations and environmental impacts; surveyors and title companies to provide legal descriptions of a property; and lenders to provide financing. The general contractor of the project hires subcontractors to put the architectural plans into action.
Land development[edit]
Further information: Land development
Purchasing unused land for a potential development is sometimes called speculative development.
Subdivision of land is the principal mechanism by which communities are developed. Technically, subdivision describes the legal and physical steps a developer must take to convert raw land into developed land. Subdivision is a vital part of a community's growth, determining its appearance, the mix of its land uses, and its infrastructure, including roads, drainage systems, water, sewerage, and public utilities.
In general, land development is the riskiest but most profitable technique as it is so dependent on the public sector for approvals and infrastructure and because it involves a long investment period with no positive cash flow.
After subdivision is complete, the developer usually markets the land to a home builder or other end user, for such uses as a warehouse or shopping center. In any case, use of spatial intelligence tools mitigate the risk of these developers by modeling the population trends and demographic make-up of the sort of customers a home builder or retailer would like to have surrounding their new development.
See also[edit]

Construction
Home construction
Property Investment Calculator

References[edit]



^ a b Frej, Anne B & Peiser, Richard B. Professional Real Estate Development, Second Edition: The ULI Guide to the Business. Urban Land Institute, 2003. p. 3.
^ New York Times, March 16, 1963, "Personality Boom is Loud for Louis Lesser"
^ Career overview - Real Estate Developer https://www.wetfeet.com/articles/career-overview-real-estate Wetfeet.com - Editor









v
t
e


Real estate developments



Commercial



Airport
Business park
Commercial area
Mixed-use development
Office building
Port

inland


Retail park
Riverfront
Shopping mall / center
Shopping streets and districts
Warehouse District





Industrial



Business cluster
Industrial district
Industrial park
Technology centers





Residential



Apartment complex
Bungalow court
City block
Company town
Golf course community
Gated community
Housing estate
Intentional community
Mixed-use development
Model dwellings for the poor
Multi-family residential
Private community
Public housing
Residential area
Retirement community
Revenue house
Single room occupancy
Subdivision
Tract housing





Science / Education



Campus
Research park

list


Satellite campus
Science park





Municipal



Arcology
Garden city movement
Model village
Planned cities
Planned community
Urban open space

parks







Buildings



Apartment
House

types


Skyscraper
Tower block
Villa





Miscellaneous



Brownfield land
Cemetery
Cluster development
Construction
Context theory
Eminent domain
Greenfield land
Greyfield land
Land-use planning
Park
Parking
Playground
Redevelopment
Regional planning
Urban design
Urban planning
Zoning












v
t
e


Real estate






Property
Tertiary sector of the economy





By location



Bangladesh
China
Italy
Kenya
Pakistan
Puerto Rico
Russia
South Korea
United Kingdom





Types



Commercial property

Commercial building


Corporate Real Estate
Extraterrestrial real estate
International real estate
Lease administration
Niche real estate

Garden real estate
Healthcare real estate
Vacation property
Arable land
Golf property
Luxury real estate


Off-plan property
Private equity real estate
Real estate owned
Residential property





Sectors



Property management
Real estate development
Real estate investing
Real estate flipping
Relocation





Law and regulation



Adverse possession
Chain of title
Closing
Concurrent estate
Conditional sale
Conveyancing
Deed
Eminent domain
Encumbrance
Foreclosure
Land law
Land registration
Leasehold estate

Lease


Property abstract
Real estate transaction

Real estate contract


Real property
Rent regulation
Severance
Torrens title
Zoning





Economics, financing
and valuation



Asset-based lending
Capitalization rate
Effective gross income
Gross Rent Multiplier
Hard money loan
Highest and best use
Investment rating for real estate
Mortgage insurance
Mortgage loan
Real estate derivative
Real estate economics
Real estate bubble
Real estate valuation
Rental value





Parties



Appraiser
Buyer agent
Buyer broker
Chartered Surveyor
Exclusive buyer agent
Land banking
Landlord
Moving company
Property manager
Real estate broker
Real estate entrepreneur
Real estate investment club
Real estate investment trust
Real property administrator





Other



Companies
Eviction
Gentrification
Graduate real estate education
Green belt
Indices
Industry trade groups
Land banking
People
Property cycle
Real estate trends
Undergraduate real estate programs
Urban decay
Urban planning








  Category
  Commons
  List of topics










 
						Retrieved from "https://en.wikipedia.org/w/index.php?title=Real_estate_development&oldid=792295691"					
Categories: Real estate and property developersArchitectureConstructionHidden categories: Articles needing additional references from September 2013All articles needing additional references 



Navigation menu


Personal tools

Not logged inTalkContributionsCreate accountLog in 



Namespaces

Article
Talk




Variants









Views

Read
Edit
View history



More







Search



 







Navigation


Main pageContentsFeatured contentCurrent eventsRandom articleDonate to WikipediaWikipedia store 



Interaction


HelpAbout WikipediaCommunity portalRecent changesContact page 



Tools


What links hereRelated changesUpload fileSpecial pagesPermanent linkPage informationWikidata itemCite this page 



Print/export


Create a bookDownload as PDFPrintable version 



Languages


العربيةБеларускаяБеларуская (тарашкевіца)‎ČeštinaDeutschEspañolEsperantoفارسیFrançais한국어LietuviųNederlands日本語PolskiPortuguêsРусскийSlovenčinaУкраїнська中文 
Edit links 





 This page was last edited on 25 July 2017, at 18:10.
Text is available under the Creative Commons Attribution-ShareAlike License;
additional terms may apply.  By using this site, you agree to the Terms of Use and Privacy Policy. Wikipedia® is a registered trademark of the Wikimedia Foundation, Inc., a non-profit organization.


Privacy policy
About Wikipedia
Disclaimers
Contact Wikipedia
Developers
Cookie statement
Mobile view



 

 








Infrastructure Development - hhrd.org
































































LOGIN


VOLUNTEER SIGNUP


GET INVOLVED 


CONTACT US 


HOME 

















REPORTS 





WHERE WE WORK 





WHAT WE DO





ABOUT US















 
                        

















                             
                        




                                        Infrastructure Development
                                    




                             
                        






                 
            




                    Investment in infrastructure development can boost the economic growth. Particularly,
                    in disaster affected areas, the reconstruction of essential public infrastructure
                    is an important ingredient for recovery, sustained economic growth and poverty reduction.
                    Our Infrastructure Development (ID) Program contributes to the rebuilding and development
                    of physical infrastructure particularly in the disaster affected areas. It helps
                    impoverished/disaster affected communities by improving their access to essential
                    infrastructure, such as schools and houses; easing access to water supply schemes;
                    employing local skilled and un-skilled labors for construction work. In the past
                    year, our focus remained on construction of school to assist earthquake victims.
                    Help HHRD fulfill its visions. Donate Generously.

                    Infrastructure Development involves fundamental structures that are required for
                    the functioning of a community & society. This is usually referred to structures
                    like roads, water supply, sewers, electrical grids, telecommunications, renewable
                    energy, and so on. At this time, the Helping Hand (USA) For Relief & Development's
                    International Infrastructure Development Program does not include larger scale civil
                    projects like roadways, electric grids, telecommunications, and renewable energy
                    (can be considered in the future). Projects like home construction, sanitation,
                    basic hygiene provision, water sources identification & boring (wells), purification
                    systems for clean water. This program has been started with the "Integrated Approach
                    towards Rebuilding Pakistan Program" and presently (April 20th, 2011) includes two
                    components: Home Construction Program (HCP) and Water & Sanitation Hygiene (WASH).
                    It is being implemented in 11 Union Councils of Pakistan. (Note: WASH is presented
                    in another module on this www.HHRD.Org website: Click WASH to enter this section)

Home Construction Program Objectives
    To construct maximum number of permanent homes in the most sustainable manner.

    To save in general the destitute and in particular the calamity affected communities,
                    from the hardships of weather;

    To lower the sufferings of the most susceptible sections of the society again
                    generally the needy and particularly the calamity affected communities: These vulnerable
                    people include widows, orphans, landless persons, and elderly;
                    

    To create sense of ownership among the beneficiaries, with proper public involvement
                    process;
                    

    To generate good employment opportunities for engineers, social workers, and people
                    in other fields.










                                 


Infrastructure Development in Pakistan: The Integrated Approach

                            Infrastructure Development involves projects like home construction, sanitation,
                            basic hygiene provision, water sources identification & wells, purification
                            systems for clean water. This program has been started with the “Integrated
                            Approach towards Rebuilding Pakistan Program” and currently includes two components:
                            Home Construction Program (HCP) and Water & Sanitation Hygiene (WASH). It is
                            being implemented in 11 Union Councils of Pakistan.

                            Union councils within this program are: In the Province of Sindh (Ghosepur Kashmore,
                            Shikarpur Sultankot, Tando Hafiz Thatha, & Toj Jacobabad); Province of Baluchistan
                            (Dirgi Jaffarabad); Province of Punjab (Jampur Rajanpur, Kot Adhoo Muzaffargarh,
                            & Dhair Umaid Ali Mianwali); and Province of Khyber Pukhtoon Khawa (Agra Charsadda,
                            Nowshera Kalan Nowshera, & Madiyan Swat).

                            It will take joint effort from the humanitarian community and long-term commitments
                            to help Pakistan rebuild its infrastructure and begin to properly address the health,
                            education and livelihood needs of its people.
Donate Generously.













This program consists of several projects in 11 most affected
                                            union councils, including Clean Water & Sanitation, Home Construction, Basic
                                            Healthcare Clinics, Interest-Free Micro-Finance, Orphan Support / Sponsorship, Skills
                                            Development Centers, Schools Buildings Reconstruction, and Wedding Gift Boxes.











 
                        















 


Upcoming Events



 



	              
	        



Click to View Events




	              
	        





















 
                                    



Quick Donation
                                                






 
                                                

 
                                                
 
                                                
 
                                                



 
                                    










 
                                    


Donation Type
Fidya
Fitra
General
Sadaqah
Zakat


														*

 
                                    





 
                                    


Please Select Project
African Drought Crisis
Burmese Relief Fund
Children With Disabilities Support Program
Eid Gift Package
Eye Surgery
Fidya
Mother Child Healthcare Centers
Muslim Charity Hospital in India
Orphan Support Program
Palestine Relief Fund
Ramadan Food Program
Skill Development Centers
Syria Humanitarian Assistance Fund
Syrian Refugees Education Program
Thar Pakistan Drought Emergency Relief Fund
Water for Life
Zakat
Let Helping Hand decide

*










Amount (US$):
                                    



														*
														*

														*























Click here 
										for Detail Donation Page





























 
                                                



Video 
																Documentaries
                                                            






 
                                                


 
                                                





 
                                                



















 


Subscribe to our Email Newsletters




 















Please click here
                                                                                    to Sign Up for our Email Newsletter




















Follow 
us on: 

 

 







 
































 
                                                




Our Partners







 
                                                


 
                                                










                                                                                              
                                                                                          
                                                                                            ICNA 
Relief USA (For Domestic Relief in USA)
                                                                                            


                                                                                              
                                                                                          
                                                                                            ICNA 
Relief Canada (For Domestic Relief in Canada)
                                                                                            


                                                                                              
                                                                                          
                                                                                            Click 
here to see our Partners list
                                                                                            










 
                                                




































 
                        



























                                                     
                                                


                                                     
                                                


                                                     
                                                













                                                    MAIN MENU
                                                


Home 


About Us


What We Do


Where We
                                                        Work


Media Gallery


Reports


Get Involved


Contact Us
                                                        




Login 


Donate Now
                                                        










                                                    OUR PROGRAMS
                                                


Orphan Support Program


Children with Disabilities Program


Interest Free
                                                        Microfinance


Health Care


Education
                                                        Support


Physical
                                                        Rehabilitation


Ifrastructure
                                                        Development




Water of Life


Skill Development


Public Advocacy & Social Justice


Matching Gift Partners program


Emergency
                                                        Appeals


Youth
                                                        Empowerment


Inkind
                                                        Gifts program


Seasonal
                                                        Program








                                                        Tax Exempt ID: 31-1628040 | 1-888-808-(HELP) 4357 | 21199 Hilltop St, Southfield MI 48033
                                                    

                                                        Helping Hand for Relief and Development is a 501 (c) relief and development organization
                                                    

                                                        © 2017 Helping Hand for Relief and Development. All Rights Reserved. 
                                                    Privacy Policy




                                                        Join the Cause
                                                    















































Orphan Support Program



$1/Day. $365/ Year. Sponsor a Child. Create a Future.
                                















Children with Disabilities Program
                                    



$2/Day. $60/Month. $720/Year. Create Hope. Sponsor a Disabled Child
                                



















Health Care



Emergency and long term medical assistance for the needy and injured.
                                















Education Support



Student Scholarships, Rebuilding Schools and Adult Literacy Programs.
                                



















Physical Rehabilitation 



Physiotherapy and artificial limbs for those who've lost mobility in disasters.
                                















Infrastructure Development



Rebuilding homes, schools and villages in disaster affected areas.
                                



















Inkind Gift Program



In-Kind Gift Centers across USA. Medical equipments and basic necessity items.
                                















Seasonal Programs



Iftar and Eid Gift Donations. Global Fitra and Zabeeha Programs in over 60 countries.
                                



















Water for Life



Providing clean water by placing water pumps, wells and sanitation programs.
                                















Skill Development
                                    



Empowering Women through skills development and vocational training
                                



















Public Advocacy & Social Justice 



Raising awareness on issues like global hunger. Supporting activism for Social Justice
                                















Matching Gift Partners Program 



Over 40 companies matching their employees' donations to HHRD. Does your company
                                            match?
                                




















Emergency
                                                Appeals 



Africa Drought Crisis, Libya Relief, Pakistan Flood Relief, Japan EQ-Tsunami Relief,
                                            Haiti Earthquake Relief and Many Others...
                                
















Youth
                                                Empowerment 



Providing Summer Internships and programs like Youth for Haiti and Youth for Japan.
                                



















Interest Free Microfinance 



 Repayment loan rate of 99.8%. Best form of Sadaqa-e-Jariya.
                                



































        Infrastructure development in Nigeria | Global law firm | Norton Rose Fulbright        























































 Use of cookies byNorton Rose Fulbright
We use cookies to deliver our online services. Details and instructions on how to disable those cookies are set out at  nortonrosefulbright.com/cookies-policy. By continuing to use this website you agree to our use of our cookies unless you have disabled them.   




















        Infrastructure development in Nigeria | Global law firm | Norton Rose Fulbright        

















  




GlobalKnowledge
Publications








Infrastructure development in Nigeria



                            Publication | November 2013                        



The potential

The hurdles


Conclusion





The potential Nigeria has one of the most promising pipelines of infrastructure PPP projects in Africa. With a rapidly growing population and expected growth rates of at least 7 per cent over the next two years (as forecast by the IMF in May 2013), the need to develop the country’s infrastructure is paramount to allow the economy to continue to develop unchecked. Accordingly, Nigeria is the focus of a great deal of attention from the international infrastructure sector currently, as a result of its infrastructure gap and the commitment of federal and state governments to fill this gap.Unreliability of power infrastructure has no doubt been a factor in sluggish development in certain parts of the economy, particular in process plant related industries. However, as a number of newly-financed IPPs come on line in the next few years, assisted by Nigeria’s power privatisation initiative, the increasing stability of power infrastructure and increased exposure of international and local investors, as well as development finance institutions (DFIs) and export credit agencies (ECAs), to the Nigerian market should assist the process of developing Nigeria’s anticipated pipeline of infrastructure projects.Lagos State, as the economic powerhouse of the country, is leading the way in this regard. With a population of over 17 million, and growing by a further half million every year, Lagos has published a clear 10-point plan to improve key aspects of its public infrastructure and avoid the city grinding to a halt.Its longer-term plan includes a number of improvements which are expected to:minimise transport bottlenecks (such as the recently completed Ikoyi-Lekki bridge and the anticipated Fourth Mainland Bridge)improve transport links to population centres and new industrial zones (such as the Lekki-Epe Expressway),improve general economic development (such as the creation of a master plan for the development of the Lekki peninsula east of Lagos, including to date the establishment of two free trade zones).create additional transport modes (such as the Lagos Metro Blue Line (in construction) and Red Line (route secured), as well as the new Lekki-Epe International Airport (currently in procurement))The importance of the Lekki peninsula as an axis for growth is underlined by the proposed greenfield deep sea Lekki Port, where financing is currently being put in place. This estimated $1.5 billion project about 60km east of the existing Lagos ports (Apapa, Tincan Island and Kirikiri) is being constructed within a free trade zone and is expected to provide an additional 2.5 million twenty-foot equivalent unit (TEU) capacity into the Nigerian container terminal market, offering a quicker and less-congested route to market for goods, and accommodating larger-capacity ships and using state-of-the-art facilities. The project is being led by the Singapore-based Tolaram group to complement its existing operations in Nigeria, with major co-investments being made at both state level (by Lagos State) and federal level (through the Nigerian Ports Authority), and also supported by International Container Terminal Services Inc of Philippines as the proposed operator.The development of public infrastructure is occurring in tandem with a huge expansion in private sector developments. In particular there are accelerating signs of growth in the property development market in Nigeria. Continuing urbanisation, an emerging middle class and a shortfall in high quality office space for international and domestic companies are key drivers for the wave of real estate developments such as retail malls, business parks and office space.Developments such as the Ikeja City Mall and Palms Shopping Mall in Lagos State, and Polo Park in Enugu State are at the forefront of the expanding retail market, with other developments such as the Osapa Convenience Centre on the Lekki-Epe Express Way in Lagos following in the tailwind. There is no shortage of companies looking to take long leaseholds of units, with the likes of Shoprite, Game and Pick n Pay leading the expansion across Africa. Office space is also developing at a pace, with the Wings Office Towers on Victoria Island and Heritage Place in the Ikoyi district of Lagos being two standout Grade A offices under development.The success of ambitious infrastructure projects such as Lekki Port would likely increase investors’ appetite to expand their operations and capture the anticipated growth. The Economist reported in September 2013 that Shoprite’s goods were taking 117 days to reach market in Nigeria, with port congestion in Lagos being a major contributor to this delay. The expansion of port capacity will therefore assist those seeking to expand their business routes into and out of Nigeria, and have substantial positive macroeconomic effect. 

The hurdles


Investment in these projects is, of course, not without its risks. Whilst some market-risk private sector projects have already successfully closed in Nigeria in recent years without any government support (such as the Nigerian-led Main One telecommunications cable between Nigeria, Ghana and Portugal, and telecoms towers developments led principally by IHS and Helios), for those projects with a key public sector delivery component, a number of key aspects will need to be in place to ensure swift closure of projects and to allow the pipeline of projects to reach its potential.Governmental support. Supporting infrastructure to the project site, whether by way of new roads or capacity upgrades to existing roads and junctions, can be a key area where government policy or undertakings can provide comfort to a greenfield project. It may be difficult to obtain fixed commitments for this, as government departments will be reluctant to commit to major expenditure on their own part until there is some certainty as to the required traffic. Without infrastructure support, however, it may be more difficult to finance the project. On some projects, the success of the project may be dependent on the delivery of essential government services, and it would be wise to structure this type of support with key service-level deliverables that the concessionaire and lenders can rely on.Credit support. The size and nature of the project may mean that additional government comfort is required to support the obligations of the relevant state agencies entering into any long-term concession contracts. Federal government support will not by itself allow a project to reach investment-grade status. DFIs will therefore continue to play an important part during this phase of infrastructure development, and in addition to mainstays such as African Development Bank and IFC, other institutions such as European Investment Bank and Islamic Development Bank are also gearing up to provide significant finance to Nigerian projects. Additional credit support arrangements such as political risk insurance (PRI) cover and ECA coverage will also play a necessary part of the funding mix for the project, although this too will add to the complexity of the projects.Exit strategy. A critical issue for lenders and other investors will be the level of government underpinning for their investment in a termination scenario, particularly on a concessionaire default. In Nigeria’s current state of PPP development, the level of necessary support is likely to remain extremely high. Not all project eventualities can be foreseen, and circumstances may arise where the project needs to be terminated or otherwise handed back to the government. This is a very topical issue, given Lagos State’s recent announcement that it had bought out 100 per cent of the equity in Lekki Concession Company Ltd (the concessionaire on the Lekki-Epe Expressway PPP since 2008) effectively returning the project back into state government control. One of the other major concession projects in the region, the Murtala Mohammed II domestic airport terminal concession, being operated by Bi-Courtney Limited, has also been the subject of very public court battles against the federal government to enforce the concessionaire’s exclusivity rights at the airport. Although Bi-Courtney most recently succeeded in court in restraining the federal government, this episode suggests that investors may need to be prepared to go to some lengths to protect their economic interests, which should either be dealt with through appropriate dispute resolution structures or otherwise factored into the risk profile for the project.Robust contract structures. Even with the above arrangements in place, the robustness of the project contract structures (such as EPC and O&M contracts) can have a large role to play in ensuring the bankability of the project. There are recent examples on Nigerian projects of subcontractors taking an enhanced role in providing protection for the concessionaire in certain project distress situations, for the benefit of the lenders. The lenders may also expect project throughputs to be guaranteed to particular levels or for these to be demonstrated by the concessionaire obtaining a sufficient level of long-term usage contracts.




Conclusion


Nigeria is now so strategically important that it cannot be ignored by investors, and increasing international interest is being matched by increased commitment by DFIs. Nigerian infrastructure PPPs to date have had a rocky start, but the market outlook still remains promising to those prepared to work hard and find an appropriate balance of risks and opportunity that will allow their project to stand the test of time.



 



 

					Sector:
					
Infrastructure, mining and commodities 
 






 
        	    	        Practice:
Infrastructure 
 

Top






Stay up to date...
Subscribe







Tweet










Contacts












Andrew Buisson

London 











Subscribe and stay up to date with the latest legal news, information and events...
Register now

































HKTDC Research











































































 



Admin Page
|


About HKTDC

|

Media Room

|

Contact HKTDC

|



Register Now
 | 



		Wish List
		 ()
|

My HKTDC 

|



Login 





Logout 



































 | 



Login




Logout

 | 





Register Now
 | 





Subscribe
























Quality Suppliers by Industry




 Product Suppliers

Auto Parts & Accessories
Building Materials & Hardware
Consumer Electronics & Electrical Appliances
Environmental Protection Equipment & Products
Food & Beverage
Furniture & Furnishing
Gift & Premiums
Health & Beauty
Jewellery
Machinery, Raw Materials & Scientific Equipment
Packaging Products & Material
Photographic & Optical Equipment
Stationery & Office Equipment
Textiles, Fabrics & Yarns
Watch & Clock
Small-Order Zone



 

Baby Products
Computer & Peripherals
Electrical Equipment & Electronic Components
Eyewear & Accessories
Footwear
Garments & Clothing Accessories
Handbags & Travel Goods
Household Products
Lighting Products
Medical Supplies and Medicine
Pet & Pet Supplies
Sports Goods
Telecom Products
Toys & Games
More...



Service Suppliers

Accounting Service
Advertising, Marketing & Public Relations Service
Business Management & Consultancy Service
Design Services & Brand Strategy
Education & Training
Entertainment
Environmental Protection Solution & Service
Event Organisation
Finance Service
Franchising & Licensing
Information Technology
Infrastructure & Real Estate
Legal Service
Logistics & Transport



 

Medical & Healthcare
Packaging
Printing
Publishing
Quality Inspection & Testing
Storage Service
Technology
Telecommunication
Tourism
More...








							HKTDC Events





Asian Financial Forum
Book Fair
Business of IP Asia Forum
Diamond, Gem & Pearl Show
Education & Careers Expo
Electronics Fair (Autumn Edition)
Entrepreneur Day
Fashion Week (Fall/Winter)
Film & TV Market (FILMART)
Gifts & Premium Fair
Home Textiles & Furnishings Fair
ICT Expo
Jewellery Show
Lighting Fair (Autumn Edition)
Medical Devices & Supplies Fair
Printing & Packaging Fair
SmartBiz Expo
Tea Fair 
Watch & Clock Fair




Baby Products Fair
Building and Decoration Materials & Hardware Fair
Chinese Medicine & Health Products Exhibition
Eco Expo Asia
ElectronicAsia
Electronics Fair (Spring Edition)
Fashion Week (Spring/Summer)
Food Expo
Franchising Show
Home Delights Expo
Houseware Fair
Inno Design Tech Expo
Licensing Show
Lighting Fair (Spring Edition)
Optical Fair
Stationery Fair
Toys & Games Fair
World Boutique
Wine & Spirits Fair








					HKTDC Research





							Service Highlight





About HKTDC
Product Magazines
SME Startup Program
Buyer Meetings
Customized Business Matching
Mobile Applications
Design Gallery
Supplier Services
Buyer Services
SME Centre











Economists' Pick






Research Reports

Research Articles

Regulatory Alert - China

Regulatory Alert - Asia

Regulatory Alert - EU

Regulatory Alert - US

International Market News

Success Stories

Expert Opinion

Economic Forum

Featured Analyses

Multimedia

Glossary

HKTDC Economists







China Trade






Economic Factsheet

The Belt and Road Initiative

Facts and Figures

Guide to Doing Business in China

Policies and Regulations

Core Trends 

China Consumer Market

Hot Topics

Online China Business Advisory Service

Customs Statistics

HS Code & Tariff Rates







HK Economy






Economic Factsheet 

Business Opportunities

Trade Statistics (BSO) 

Export Prospects

HKTDC Export Index 

Hong Kong Industry Profiles 

Hot Topics

Guide to Doing Business in Hong Kong

Small Business Resources

Visa on Demand







Developed Markets






Economic Factsheet

Asia-Pacific

North America

Western Europe

Guide to Doing Business with EU

Guide to Doing Business with US







Emerging Markets






Economic Factsheet

Infographics

Africa

ASEAN

Asia

Emerging Europe

Latin America

Middle East







Product Industries






Auto Parts & Accessories

Baby Products

Electronics & Electricals

Food & Beverages

Garments & Textiles

Gifts & Houseware

Health & Beauty

Leather Goods & Footwear

Timepieces, Jewellery & Optical Goods

Toys & Sporting Goods







Service Industries






Accounting, Management Consultancy & Corporate Services

Convention & Exhibition Business

Design & Marketing

Film & Audio-Visual Production

Finance Services

Franchising & Licensing

Information & Communications Technology

Infrastructure & Real Estate

Legal Services

Logistics & Maritime Services

Medical Services

Technology

Testing & Certification



































Advanced Search




Keywords:
Guangdong-Hong Kong-Macau Bay Area    
start-up    
China’s middle-class    
Indonesia infographics    
ASEAN Business Guides    















Shift of Global Supply Chain and Guangdong-Hong Kong Industrial Development (Executive Summary)
Development Prospects for Guangdong-Hong Kong-Macau Bay Area and the Role of Hong Kong
The Challenges Facing Hong Kong Start-ups: Access to Funding
China’s Middle-Class Consumers: Attitudes towards Service Consumption
A Practical Guide to Doing Business in Malaysia




Previous



Next











Latest Update


3 Aug

The Belt and Road Initiative: External Reports
							
							
							




3 Aug

Mandatory State Insurance Contributions Set to...
							
							
							




3 Aug

Poland Set to be Beneficiary of Rising...
							
							
							




3 Aug

Online China Business Advisory Service
							
							
							




3 Aug

Online CBA: What is the Difference between the...
							
							
							




3 Aug

The Challenges Facing Hong Kong Start-ups:...
							
							
							















Research Articles
Regulatory Alert
IMN
CEPA










Economists' Pick - Research Articles


The Challenges Facing Hong Kong Start-ups: Access to Talent
									
									
									
									


Access to talent is one of the main challenges facing Hong Kong start-ups , due to their limited resources and Hong Kong’s dependence on the real estate and financial sectors. While tech start-ups may outsource their tasks to someone outside Hong Kong on a project basis, not all job...
									





Economists' Pick - Research Articles


China’s Middle-Class Consumers: Online Shopping Habits
									
									
									
										





Economists' Pick - Research Articles


The Challenges Facing Hong Kong Start-ups: Access to Funding
									
									
									
										











Economists' Pick - Regulatory Alert - China


Mandatory State Insurance Contributions Set to be Reduced
									
									
									
									


Contributions are to be reduced to pension insurance, medical insurance, unemployment insurance, work-related injury insurance, maternity insurance and the housing provident fund (known as the “five insurances and one fund”), while other labour costs are also in line to be cut.
									





Economists' Pick - Regulatory Alert - China


CFDA Issues New Rapid Food Testing Guidelines
									
									
									
										





Economists' Pick - Regulatory Alert - China


Guangdong Issues 13th Five-Year Plan for Cold Chain Logistics Sector
									
									
									
										











Economists' Pick - International Market News


Poland Set to be Beneficiary of Rising Mainland Production Costs
									
									
									
									


East European country claims relocated manufacturing windfall as mainland labour costs continue to soar.
									





Economists' Pick - International Market News


Cost and Security Concerns Hampering Adoption of IIoT Across Asia
									
									
									
										





Economists' Pick - International Market News


Mass-market Japan Opts for Sleek, with Quirks Reserved for the Rich
									
									
									
										











Economists' Pick - Research Articles


CEPA 2017: New Measures and New Opportunities for Hong Kong
									
									
									
									


The signing of Investment Agreement and the Ecotech Agreement has turned CEPA into a full-fledged FTA, on the one hand providing greater clarity on protection of investment in services sectors, non-services and other classes of assets between Hong Kong and the mainland, and on the other,...
									





Economists' Pick - Regulatory Alert - China


New CEPA and Ecotech Agreements Extend Investment and Co-operation Opportunities
									
									
									
										





Economists' Pick - Regulatory Alert - China


Six Additional Hong Kong/Macau Origin Products Granted CEPA Zero Tariff Status
									
									
									
										









Advertisement







China Trade





Latest Update


The Belt and Road Initiative: External Reports
										
										
										




Mandatory State Insurance Contributions Set to be Reduced
										
										
										




Online China Business Advisory Service
										
										
										








				 
				
				Provinces & Cities
				
				
					


Please select a province or city
Beijing
Chongqing
Gansu
Guangdong
Henan
Pearl River Delta
Shanghai
Tianjin
Yunnan
More










				 
				
				Guide to Doing Business in China
				
				
					


Please select an item
Set up a Company
Import & Export 
Selling in China
Inspection & Quarantine
Tax
Foreign Exchange Control 
Finance & Accounting 
Staff Recruitment 
Intellectual Property Rights
Practical Tips



















Developed Markets





Latest Update


Cost and Security Concerns Hampering Adoption of IIoT Across Asia
										
										
										




Mass-market Japan Opts for Sleek, with Quirks Reserved for the Rich
										
										
										




Start of Trilogue Talks on Final Text of New Anti-dumping Rules
										
										
										








				 
				
				All Developed Markets
				
				
					


Please select a country or area
Australia
Canada
EU
France
Germany
Italy
Japan
Korea
Netherlands
New Zealand
Singapore
Spain
Taiwan
UK
US













Product Industries





Latest Update


CFDA Issues New Rapid Food Testing Guidelines
										
										
										




Cost and Security Concerns Hampering Adoption of IIoT Across Asia
										
										
										




Textiles Industry in Hong Kong
										
										
										








				 
				
				All Product Industries
				
				
					


Please select an industry
Auto Parts & Accessories
Baby Products
Electronics & Electricals
Food & Beverages
Garments & Textiles
Gifts & Houseware
Health & Beauty
Leather Goods & Footwear
Timepieces, Jewellery & Optical Goods
Toys & Sporting Goods















HK Economy





Latest Update


The Challenges Facing Hong Kong Start-ups: Access to Talent
										
										
										




Textiles Industry in Hong Kong
										
										
										




The Challenges Facing Hong Kong Start-ups: Access to Funding
										
										
										








				 
				
				Visa on Demand
				
				
					


Please select a country
Bangladesh
Cambodia
Indonesia
Myanmar
Romania
Taiwan
United States of America
Vietnam
More










				 
				
				Small Business Resources
				
				
					


Please select an item
Setting up Business in Hong Kong
SME Finance
Import/Export Procedures of Hong Kong 
Trade Regulations
HKTDC SME Centre
HKTDC SME Start-Up Programme
HKTDC Business Advisory Services
Business Tools










				 
				
				Guide to Doing Business in Hong Kong
				
				
					


Please select an item
Set up a Company 
Listing in Hong Kong 
Tax System 
Operating Costs 
Import & Export Procedures 
Hong Kong Services 
Trade Associations
Government Departments
















Emerging Markets





Latest Update


Poland Set to be Beneficiary of Rising Mainland Production Costs
										
										
										




THAILAND: Exporters of Potential Dual Use Items to Face Increased Customs Scrutiny
										
										
										




PHILIPPINES: Pangasinan Investors Wooed with Tax Breaks and Streamlined Processing
										
										
										








				 
				
				All Emerging Markets
				
				
					


Please select a country or area
ASEAN
Cambodia
Indonesia
Malaysia
Myanmar
Philippines
South Africa
Thailand
Vietnam
More













Service Industries





Latest Update


Mandatory State Insurance Contributions Set to be Reduced
										
										
										




China’s Middle-Class Consumers: Online Shopping Habits
										
										
										




Guangdong Issues 13th Five-Year Plan for Cold Chain Logistics Sector
										
										
										








				 
				
				All Service Industries
				
				
					


Please select an industry
Accounting, Management Consultancy & Corporate Services  
Design & Marketing
Convention & Exhibition Business
Film & Audio-Visual Production
Finance Services
Franchising & Licensing
Information & Communications Technology
Infrastructure & Real Estate
Legal Services
Logistics & Maritime Services
Medical Services
Technology
Testing & Certification




































































Hong Kong’s Mid-Year Export Performance and Prospects for the Latter Half of 2017
India as an Alternative Production Base for Hong Kong 
Receivable Management in ASEAN Markets






















Hong Kong’s Mid-Year Export Performance and Prospects for the Latter Half of 2017
India as an Alternative Production Base for Hong Kong 
Receivable Management in ASEAN Markets


more













Fun Facts on India

Gujarat as a production base





Petrol Capital 
Denim City


Gujarat is an industrial powerhouse in West India, also known as the ‘Petrol Capital of India’ and an automobile manufacturing hub.select againmore
Gujarat, a textile industry manufacturing hub, is the third largest denim producer in the world.select againmore














  Guide to Doing Business with the EU – Germany, UK, France and Italy (2017 Edition)  China’s Watch Shoppers  China's Skincare and Cosmetics Market  Guide to Protecting Intellectual Property Rights in China






Most Read


Most Commented




Economic and Trade Information on Hong Kong 
China Customs Statistics 
Economic and Trade Information on China 
HKTDC Business Advisory Services 
The Belt and Road Initiative 




ASEAN in Focus: Prospects for Production Bases in Thailand 
Economic and Trade Information on Hong Kong 
Myanmar: Market Profile 
The Belt and Road Initiative 
Import Controls Proposed on Precursor Chemical, Six Synthetic Cannabinoids 



Advertisement
















































			
			
					
		More
		
















GET OUR WEEKLY EMAIL UPDATES




EMAIL*


FIRST NAME*



LAST NAME*



COUNTRY / REGION*

Please specify
Afghanistan
Albania
Algeria
American Samoa
Andorra
Angola
Anguilla
Antigua and Barbuda
Argentina
Armenia
Aruba
Australia
Austria
Azerbaijan
Bahamas
Bahrain
Bangladesh
Barbados
Belarus
Belgium
Belize
Benin
Bermuda
Bhutan
Bolivia
Bosnia and Herzegovina
Botswana
Brazil
British Indian Ocean Territory
British Virgin Islands
Brunei Darussalam
Bulgaria
Burkina Faso
Burundi
Cabo Verde
Cambodia
Cameroon
Canada
Caribbean Netherlands
Cayman Islands
Central African Republic
Chad
Chile
China
Colombia
Comoros
Congo
Cook Islands
Costa Rica
Cote d'Ivoire
Croatia
Cuba
Curacao
Cyprus
Czech Republic
Democratic Republic of the Congo
Denmark
Djibouti
Dominica
Dominican Republic
Ecuador
Egypt
El Salvador
Equatorial Guinea
Eritrea
Estonia
Ethiopia
Falkland Islands
Faroe Islands
Fiji
Finland
France
French Guiana
French Polynesia
Gabon
Gambia
Georgia
Germany
Ghana
Gibraltar
Greece
Greenland
Grenada
Guadeloupe
Guam
Guatemala
Guinea
Guinea-Bissau
Guyana
Haiti
Honduras
Hong Kong
Hungary
Iceland
India
Indonesia
Iran
Iraq
Ireland
Israel
Italy
Jamaica
Japan
Jordan
Kazakhstan
Kenya
Kiribati
Korea, Democratic People's Republic of
Korea, Republic Of
Kuwait
Kyrgyzstan
Laos
Latvia
Lebanon
Lesotho
Liberia
Libya
Liechtenstein
Lithuania
Luxembourg
Macau
Macedonia
Madagascar
Malawi
Malaysia
Maldives
Mali
Malta
Marshall Islands
Martinique
Mauritania
Mauritius
Mayotte
Mexico
Micronesia, Federated States Of
Monaco
Mongolia
Montenegro
Montserrat
Morocco
Mozambique
Myanmar
Namibia
Nauru
Nepal
Netherlands
New Caledonia
New Zealand
Nicaragua
Niger
Nigeria
Niue Island
Norfolk Island
Northern Mariana Islands
Norway
Oman
Pakistan
Palau
Panama
Papua New Guinea
Paraguay
Peru
Philippines
Pitcairn Island
Poland
Portugal
Puerto Rico
Qatar
Republic of Moldova
Reunion
Romania
Russia
Rwanda
Saint Helena
Saint Kitts and Nevis
Saint Lucia
Saint Martin
Saint Pierre & Miquelon
Saint Vincent and the Grenadin
Saint-Barthelemy
Samoa
San Marino
Sao Tome and Principe
Saudi Arabia
Senegal
Serbia
Seychelles
Sierra Leone
Singapore
Sint Maarten
Slovakia
Slovenia
Solomon Islands
Somalia
South Africa
South Sudan
Spain
Sri Lanka
Sudan
Suriname
Swaziland
Sweden
Switzerland
Syria
Taiwan
Tajikistan
Tanzania
Thailand
Timor-Leste
Togo
Tonga
Trinidad And Tobago
Tunisia
Turkey
Turkmenistan
Turks & Caicos Island
Tuvalu
Uganda
Ukraine
United Arab Emirates
United Kingdom
United States Virgin Islands
Uruguay
USA
Uzbekistan
Vanuatu
Venezuela
Vietnam
Wallis & Futuna Islands
Western Sahara
Yemen
Zambia
Zimbabwe














THANK YOU
Thank you for registering.
CONTINUE READING









 





        Font



 Print this page




Email this page




﻿ Newsletter





﻿ RSS Feeds





Mobile Device




﻿ Manage your HKTDC e-subscription




﻿ Suppliers











Regional Websites:







































hktdc.com Home
 | 
About HKTDC
 | 
Contact HKTDC
 | 
Advertise with HKTDC
 | 
Terms of Use
 | 
Privacy Statement
 | 
Hyperlink Policy
 | 
Site Map
 | 
京ICP备09059244号







 



Copyright © 2000-2017
				  Hong Kong Trade Development Council. All rights reserved.


  


 









































